California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) If a minor is adjudged a ward of the court on the grounds that the minor is a person described by Section 602, the court may commit the ward to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice if the ward has committed an offense described in subdivision (b) of Section 707 or subdivision (c) of Section 290.008 of the Penal Code, and has been the subject of a motion filed to transfer the ward to the jurisdiction of the criminal court as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 736.5 and is not otherwise ineligible for commitment to the division under Section 733.

(b) A ward committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice shall not be confined in excess of the term of confinement set by the committing court. The court
 shall set a maximum term based upon the facts and circumstances of the matter or matters that brought or continued the ward under the jurisdiction of the court and as deemed appropriate to achieve rehabilitation. The court shall not commit a ward to the Division of Juvenile Justice for a period that exceeds the middle term of imprisonment that could be imposed upon an adult convicted of the same offense. This subdivision does not limit the power of the Board of Juvenile Hearings to discharge a ward committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice pursuant to Sections 1719 and 1769. Upon discharge, the committing court may retain jurisdiction of the ward pursuant to Section 607.1 and establish the conditions of supervision pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1766.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021, and shall remain in effect until the final closure of the Division of Juvenile Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 8.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.   Section operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.   Inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: The version of Section 731 operative preceding the operation of this added Section 731 is as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

731.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the court committing a ward to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, upon the recommendation of the chief probation officer of the county, may recall that commitment in the case of any ward confined in an institution operated by the division. Upon recall of the ward, the court shall set and convene a recall disposition hearing for the purpose of ordering
 an alternative disposition for the ward that is appropriate under all of the circumstances prevailing in the case. The court shall provide to the division no less than 15 days advance notice of the recall hearing date, and the division shall transport and deliver the ward to the custody of the probation department of the committing county no less than five days prior to the scheduled date of the recall hearing. Pending the recall disposition hearing, the ward shall be supervised, detained, or housed in the manner and place, consistent with the requirements of law, as may be directed by the court in its order of recall. The timing and procedure of the recall disposition hearing shall be consistent with the rules, rights, and procedures applicable to delinquency disposition hearings, as described in Article 17 (commencing with Section 675).

(b) A court may also convene a recall disposition hearing, as specified in subdivision (a), regarding any
 ward who
 remains under parole supervision by the Division of Juvenile Parole Operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 75.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Became operative on December 13, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 84 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

731.2.

(a) The Department of the Youth Authority and Fresno County may enter into a partnership for the establishment and maintenance of a pilot program juvenile boot camp similar to the program described in Section 731.6, but developed primarily by the county with the Department of the Youth Authority and the county sharing the costs equally, except as specified in subdivision (b).

(b) Under the partnership, the Department of the Youth Authority shall bear all the costs of retrofitting a facility, which is to be provided by the county at county expense.

(c) The implementation of this pilot program shall be contingent upon the appropriation of funds to the Department of the Youth Authority for the pilot program in either the Budget Act of 1996 or subsequent legislation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1055, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

731.5.

In addition to the provisions of Section 731, if a minor’s conduct constitutes a violation of Section 490.5 of the Penal Code, the court may require the minor to perform public services designated by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

Before a minor is conveyed to any state or county institution pursuant to this article, it shall be ascertained from the superintendent thereof that such person can be received.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

A ward of the juvenile court who meets any condition described below shall not be committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities:

(a) The ward is under 11 years of age.

(b) The ward is suffering from any contagious, infectious, or other disease that would probably endanger the lives or health of the other inmates of any facility.

(c) The ward has been or is adjudged a ward of the court pursuant to Section 602, and the most recent offense alleged in any petition and admitted or found to be true by the court is not described in
 subdivision (b) of Section 707 or subdivision (c) of Section 290.008 of the Penal Code. This subdivision shall be effective on and after September 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   (AB 324)   Effective February 29, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

733.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as otherwise provided in this section, a ward of the juvenile court shall not be committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice on or after July 1, 2021.

(b) A court may commit a ward to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice as authorized in subdivision (c) of Section 736.5.

(c) Effective July 1, 2021, a person adjudged a ward of the court pursuant to Section 602, shall not be committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, as long as allocations required by Section 1991 are authorized in statute and disbursed by September 1, 2021,
 and September 1 annually thereafter. To the extent that the allocations required by Section 1991 are not authorized in statute and disbursed annually thereafter, it is the intent of this section that wards adjudged wards of the court pursuant to Section 602 for an offense described in subdivision (b) of Section 707 of this code or subdivision (c) of Section 290.008 of the Penal Code may be committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice or, upon the final closure of the Division of Juvenile Justice, another state-funded facility, if the ward could have been committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice pursuant to Section 731, as that section read on January 1, 2021, and Sections 733, 734, and 736.5. For the purpose of determining the state’s compliance with this subdivision, the presumption shall be that the state is meeting its commitment in Section 1991 if that section is not materially changed from the law in effect on the operative date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 9.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

No ward of the juvenile court shall be committed to the Youth Authority unless the judge of the court is fully satisfied that the mental and physical condition and qualifications of the ward are such as to render it probable that he will be benefited by the reformatory educational discipline or other treatment provided by the Youth Authority.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

735.

Accompanying the commitment papers, the court shall send to the Director of the Youth Authority a summary of all the facts in the possession of the court, covering the history of the ward committed and a statement of the mental and physical condition of the ward.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

736.

(a) Except as provided in Section 733, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, shall accept a ward committed to it pursuant to this article if the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice believes that the ward can be materially benefited by the division’s reformatory and educational discipline, and if the division has adequate facilities, staff, and programs to provide that care. A ward subject to this section shall not be transported to any facility under the jurisdiction of the division until the superintendent of the facility has notified the committing court of the place to which that ward is to be transported and the time at which he or she can be received.

(b) To determine who is best served by the Division of Juvenile Facilities, and who would be better served by the State Department of State Hospitals, the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice and the Director of State Hospitals shall, at least annually, confer and establish policy with respect to the types of cases that should be the responsibility of each department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 13.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

736.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to close the Division of Juvenile Justice within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, through shifting responsibility for all youth adjudged a ward of the court, commencing July 1, 2021, to county governments and providing annual funding for county governments to fulfill this new responsibility.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2021, a ward shall not be committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, except as described in subdivision (c).

(c) Pending the final closure of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, a court may commit a ward who is otherwise eligible to be committed
 under existing law and in whose case a motion to transfer the minor from juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction was filed. The court shall consider, as an alternative to commitment to the Division of Juvenile Justice, placement in local programs, including those established as a result of the implementation of Chapter 337 of the Statutes of 2020.

(d) All wards committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice prior to July 1, 2021 or pursuant to (c), shall remain within its custody until the ward is discharged, released or otherwise moved pursuant to law, or until final closure of the Division of Juvenile Justice.

(e) The Division of Juvenile Justice within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall close on June 30, 2023.

(f) The Director of the
 Division of Juvenile Justice shall develop a plan, by January 1, 2022, for the transfer of jurisdiction of youth remaining at the Division of Juvenile Justice who are unable to discharge or otherwise move pursuant to law prior to final closure on June 30, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 10.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

737.

(a) Whenever a person has been adjudged a ward of the juvenile court and has been committed or otherwise disposed of as provided in this chapter for the care of wards of the juvenile court, the court may order that the ward be detained until the execution of the order of commitment or of other disposition.

(b) In any case in which a minor or nonminor is detained for more than 15 days pending the execution of the order of commitment or of any other disposition, the court shall periodically review the case to determine whether the delay is reasonable. These periodic reviews shall occur at a hearing held at least every 15 days, commencing from the time
 the minor or nonminor was initially detained pending the execution of the order of commitment or of any other disposition. Prior to the hearing, the probation officer shall contact appropriate placements in order to identify specific, appropriate, and available placements for the minor or nonminor. During the course of each review, the court shall inquire regarding the action taken by the probation department to carry out its order, the reasons for the delay, and the effect of the delay upon the minor or nonminor. The probation department shall explain to the court what steps have been taken to identify an appropriate placement for the minor or nonminor.

(c) (1) A court shall not consider any of the following to be a reasonable delay:

(A) The
 probation officer’s inability to identify a specific, appropriate, and available placement for the minor or nonminor when the court finds that the probation officer has not made reasonable efforts to identify a specific, appropriate, and available placement for the minor or nonminor.

 (B) A delay caused by administrative processes, including, but not limited to, the workload of county personnel, transfer or reassignment of a case, or the availability of reports or records.

(C) A delay in convening any meetings between agencies. For purposes of this paragraph, “agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 727.

(2) This subdivision does not preclude the court from determining that any other delay is not
 reasonable, including, but not limited to, in the case of a minor or nonminor who was previously adjudged to be a dependent child of the court and was in foster care at the time the petition was filed pursuant to Section 601 or 602, if the probation officer does not identify a specific, appropriate, and available placement for the minor or nonminor in the case plan described in Section 706.6 upon the court issuing its orders pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 727, unless the probation officer provides documentation that his or her efforts to find an appropriate placement were reasonable.

(d) (1) If the court finds the delay to be unreasonable, the court shall order the probation officer to assess the availability of any suitable temporary placements or other alternatives to continued detention of the minor or nonminor in a secure setting. The court may order that the minor or nonminor be placed in a suitable and available temporary nonsecure placement or alternative to continued detention after consultation with all interested parties present at the hearing, including the probation officer, the minor or nonminor, the family of the minor or nonminor, and other providers of services. In addition to the orders authorized
 by this subdivision, the court may issue any other orders or relief pursuant to its authority under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 727.

(2) The court shall continue to periodically review the case, pursuant to subdivision (b), until the execution of the order of commitment or of other disposition.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature, in amending this section in the 2013–14 Regular Session, that minors and nonminors are to be released to their court-ordered dispositions expeditiously, and that any unreasonable periods of detention must be eliminated because they are not in the best interests of the minor or nonminor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 615, Sec. 2.   (AB 2607)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

738.

In a case where the residence of a minor placed on probation under the provisions of Section 725 or of a ward of the juvenile court is out of the state and in another state or foreign country, or in a case where such minor is a resident of this state but his parents, relatives, guardian, or person charged with his custody is in another state, the court may order such minor sent to his parents, relatives, or guardian, or to the person charged with his custody, or, if the minor is a resident of a foreign country, to an official of a juvenile court of such foreign country or an agency of such country authorized to accept the minor, and in such case may order transportation and accommodation furnished, with or without an attendant, as the court deems necessary. If the court deems an attendant necessary, the court may order the probation officer or other suitable person to serve as such attendant. The probation officer shall authorize the necessary expenses of such minor and of the attendant and claims therefor shall be audited, allowed and paid in the same manner as other county claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

739.

(a) Upon referral to the probation officer of a minor who has been taken into temporary custody under Section 625, the probation officer may authorize a medical examination that complies with regulations adopted by the Corrections Standards Authority. If the minor is retained in custody by the probation officer, and prior to the court detention hearing required under Section 632, the probation officer may authorize medical or dental treatment or care based on the written recommendation of the examining physician and considered necessary for the health of the minor. No treatment or care under this subdivision may be authorized by the
 probation officer unless the probation officer has made a reasonable effort to notify and to obtain the consent of the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis for the minor, and, if the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis objects, the treatment or care shall be given only upon order of the court in the exercise of its discretion. The probation officer shall document the efforts made to notify and obtain parental consent under this subdivision and shall enter this information into the case file for the minor.

(b) Whenever it appears to the juvenile court that any person concerning whom a petition has been filed with the court is in need of medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care, and that there is no parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis capable of authorizing or willing to authorize the remedial care or treatment for that person, the court, upon the written
 recommendation of a licensed physician and surgeon or, if the person needs dental care, a licensed dentist, and after due notice to the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, if any, may make an order authorizing the performance of the necessary medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care for that person.

(c) Whenever a person is placed by order of the juvenile court within the care and custody or under the supervision of the probation officer of the county in which the person resides and it appears to the court that there is no parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis capable of authorizing or willing to authorize medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care or treatment for the person, the court may, after due notice to the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, if any, order that the probation officer may authorize the medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care for the person by
 licensed practitioners, as may from time to time appear necessary.

(d) (1) Whenever it appears that a minor otherwise within subdivision (a), (b), or (c) requires immediate emergency medical, surgical, or other remedial care in an emergency situation, that care may be provided by a licensed physician and surgeon or, if the minor needs dental care in an emergency situation, by a licensed dentist, without a court order and upon authorization of a probation officer. If the minor needs foot or ankle care within the scope of practice of podiatric medicine, as defined in Section 2472 of the Business and Professions Code, a probation officer may authorize the care to be provided by a podiatrist after obtaining the advice and concurrence of a physician and surgeon. The probation officer shall make reasonable efforts to
 obtain the consent of, or to notify, the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis prior to authorizing emergency medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial
 care.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “emergency situation” means a minor requires immediate treatment for the alleviation of severe pain or an immediate diagnosis and treatment of an unforeseeable medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial condition or contagious disease that, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, would lead to serious disability or death. An emergency situation also includes known
 conditions or illnesses that, during any period of secure detention of the minor by the probation officer, require immediate laboratory testing, medication, or treatment to prevent an imminent and severe or life-threatening risk to the health of the minor.

(e) In any case in which the court orders the performance of any medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care pursuant to this section, the court may also make an order authorizing the release of information concerning that care to probation officers, parole officers, or any other qualified individuals or agencies caring for or acting in the interest and welfare of the minor under order, commitment, or approval of the court.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the right of a parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, who has not been deprived of the custody or
 control of the minor by order of the court, in providing any medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial treatment recognized or permitted under the laws of this state.

(g) The parent of any person described in this section may authorize the performance of medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care provided for in this section notwithstanding his or her age or marital status. In nonemergency situations the parent authorizing the care shall notify the other parent prior to the administration of the care.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with a minor’s right to authorize or refuse medical, surgical, dental, or other
 care when the minor’s consent for care is sufficient or specifically required pursuant to existing law, or to interfere with a minor’s right to refuse, verbally or in writing, nonemergency medical and mental health care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

739.5.

(a) (1) If a minor who has been adjudged a ward of the court under Section 601 or 602 is removed from the physical custody of the parent under Section 726 and placed into foster care, as defined in Section 727.4, only a juvenile court judicial officer shall have authority to make orders regarding the administration of psychotropic medications for that minor. The juvenile court may issue a specific order delegating this authority to a parent upon making findings on the record that the parent poses no danger to the minor and has the capacity to authorize psychotropic medications. Court authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication shall be based on a request from a physician, indicating the reasons for the request, a description of the minor’s diagnosis and behavior, the expected results
 of the medication, and a description of any side effects of the medication.

(2) (A) The Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this section, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, associations representing current and former foster children, caregivers, and minor’s attorneys. This effort shall be undertaken in coordination with the updates required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 369.5.

(B) The rules of court and forms developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall address all of the
 following:

(i) The minor and the minor’s caregiver and court-appointed special advocate, if any, have an opportunity to provide input on the medications being prescribed.

(ii) Information regarding the minor’s overall mental health assessment and treatment plan is provided to the court.

(iii) Information regarding the rationale for the proposed medication, provided in the context of past and current treatment efforts, is provided to the court. This information shall include, but not be limited to, information on other pharmacological and nonpharmacological treatments that have been utilized and the minor’s response to those treatments, a discussion of symptoms not alleviated or ameliorated by other current or past treatment efforts, and an explanation of how the psychotropic medication being prescribed is expected to
 improve the minor’s symptoms.

(iv) Guidance is provided to the court on how to evaluate the request for authorization, including how to proceed if information, otherwise required to be included in a request for authorization under this section, is not included in a request for authorization submitted to the court.

(C) The rules of court and forms developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include a process for periodic oversight by the court of orders regarding the administration of psychotropic medications that includes the caregiver’s and minor’s observations regarding the effectiveness of the medication and side effects, information on medication management appointments and other followup appointments with medical practitioners, and information on the delivery of other mental health treatments that are a part of the minor’s overall treatment plan. This oversight process shall
 be conducted in conjunction with other regularly scheduled court hearings and reports provided to the court by the county probation agency.

(D) (i) By September 1, 2020, the forms developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include a request for authorization by the minor or the minor’s attorney to release the minor’s medical information to the Medical Board of California in order to ascertain whether there is excessive prescribing of psychotropic medication that is inconsistent with the standard of care described in Section 2245 of the Business and Professions Code. The authorization shall be limited to medical information relevant to the investigation of the prescription of psychotropic medication, and the information may only be used for the purpose set forth in this subparagraph and Section 2245 of the Business and Professions Code.

(ii) The Medical
 Board of California or its representative shall request the medical information obtained pursuant to this section to be sealed if the medical information is admitted as an exhibit in an administrative hearing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The agency that completes the request for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication is encouraged to complete the request within three business days of receipt from the physician of the information necessary to fully complete the request.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision is intended to change current local practice or local court rules with respect to the preparation and submission of requests for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication.

(c) (1) Within seven court days from receipt by the court of a completed request, the juvenile court judicial officer shall either approve or deny in writing a request for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication to the minor, or shall, upon a request by the parent, the legal guardian, or the minor’s attorney, or upon its own motion, set the matter for hearing.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 827 or any other law, upon the approval or denial by the juvenile court judicial officer of a request for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication, the county probation agency or other person or entity who submitted the request shall provide a copy of the court order approving or denying the request to the minor’s caregiver.

(B) If the court approves the request, the copy of the order shall include the last two pages of form JV-220(A) or the last two pages of JV-220(B) and all medication information sheets that were attached to form JV-220(A) or form JV-220(B), which are all referenced in Rule 5.640 of the California Rules of Court.

(C) If the child changes placement, the social worker or probation officer shall provide the new caregiver with a copy of the order, including the last two pages of form JV-220(A) or the last two pages of JV-220(B), and the medication information sheets that were attached to form JV-220(A) or form JV-220(B), which are all referenced in Rule 5.640 of the California Rules of Court.

(d) Psychotropic medication or psychotropic drugs are those medications administered for the purpose of affecting the central nervous system to treat psychiatric disorders or illnesses. These medications include, but are not limited to, anxiolytic agents, antidepressants, mood stabilizers, antipsychotic medications, anti-Parkinson agents, hypnotics, medications for dementia, and psychostimulants.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to supersede local court rules regarding a minor’s right to participate in mental health decisions.

(f) This section does not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 812, Sec. 2.   (SB 528)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

739.6.

(a) (1) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall contract for child psychiatry services to complete a record review for all authorization requests for psychotropic medications for which a second opinion review is requested by a county. The second opinion review shall occur within three business days of the county request and shall include discussion of the psychosocial interventions that have been or will be offered to the child and caretaker, if appropriate, to address the behavioral health needs of the child.

(2) (A) Recommended indicators for identifying those requests for authorizations of psychotropic medications for which a
 county may request a second opinion record review may include, but are not limited to, prescriptions for concurrent psychotropic medications, dosages that exceed recommended guidelines for use in children, off-label prescribing, and requests for psychotropic medication usage without any other concurrent psychosocial services.

(B) The State Department of Social Services shall, by July 1, 2018, issue guidance regarding the second opinion review process and may periodically revise that guidance following consultation with counties, other state departments, advocates for children and youth, and other stakeholders.

(3) The child psychiatry services contracted for by the State Department of Social Services shall be available to provide second opinion reviews to those counties that do not have a second opinion review program. This section does not prohibit a county from operating its own
 second opinion review program and does not supersede any county-operated second opinion review program.

(4) This section does not prevent the administration of medication in an emergency, as otherwise authorized or required by law or regulation.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek any necessary federal approvals to obtain federal financial participation for the second opinion review service pursuant to this section, including any approvals necessary to obtain enhanced federal financial participation as applicable. Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals are obtained by the department and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 12.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

740.

(a) Any minor adjudged to be a ward of the court on the basis that he or she is a person described in Section 602 and who is placed in a community care facility shall be placed in a community care facility within his or her county of residence, unless both of the following apply:

(1) He or she has identifiable needs requiring specialized care that cannot be provided in a local facility or his or her needs dictate physical separation from his or her family.

(2) The county of residence agrees to pay the placement county the costs of providing services to the minor, pursuant to Section 1566.25 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) Before the placement of a minor adjudged to be a ward of the court on the basis that he or she is a person described in Section 602 in any community care facility outside the ward’s county of residence, the probation officer of the county making the placement, or in the case of a ward of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, the parole officer in charge of his or her case, shall send, via mail, delivery, fax, or electronically, written notice of the placement, including the name of the ward, the juvenile record of the ward (including any known prior offenses), and the ward’s county of residence, to the probation officer of the county in which the community care facility is located. It is the intention of the Legislature, in regard to this requirement, that the probation officer of the county making the placement, or in the case of a ward of the Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, the parole officer in charge of his or her case, shall make his or her best efforts to send, via mail, fax, or electronically, or to hand deliver, the notice at least 24 hours prior to the time the placement is made. When that placement is terminated, the probation officer of the county making the placement, or in the case of a ward of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, the parole officer in charge of his or her case, shall send notice thereof to any person or agency receiving notification of the placement.

(2) When it has been determined that it is necessary for a ward whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program to be placed in a county other than the ward’s parents’ or guardians’ county of residence, the specific reason the out-of-county placement is necessary shall be documented in the
 ward’s case plan. If the reason is lack of resources in the sending county to meet the specific needs of the ward, those specific resources needs shall be documented in the case plan.

(3) When it has been determined that a ward whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program is to be placed out-of-county and that the sending county is to maintain responsibility for supervision and visitation of the ward, the sending county shall develop a plan of supervision and visitation activities to be performed, and shall specify that the sending county is responsible for performing those activities. In addition to the plan of supervision and visitation, the sending county shall document information regarding known or suspected gang affiliation or dangerous behavior of the ward that indicates the ward may pose a safety concern in the receiving county. The sending county shall send to the receiving
 county a copy of the plan of supervision and visitation, in addition to the notice of placement required in paragraph (1), prior to placement of the ward. If placement occurs on a holiday or weekend, the plan of supervision and visitation and the notice of placement shall be provided to the receiving county on or before the end of the next business day.

(4) When it has been determined that a ward whose placement is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program is to be placed out-of-county and the sending county plans that the receiving county shall be responsible for the supervision and visitation of the ward, the sending county shall develop a formal agreement between the sending and receiving counties. The formal agreement shall specify the supervision and visitation to be provided the ward, and shall specify that the receiving county is responsible for providing the supervision and visitation. The formal
 agreement shall be approved and signed by the sending and receiving counties prior to placement of the ward in the receiving county. Additionally, the notice of placement required by paragraph (1) shall be provided to the receiving county prior to placement of the ward in that county. Upon completion of the case plan, the sending county shall provide a copy of the completed case plan to the receiving county. The case plan shall include information regarding known or suspected gang affiliation or dangerous behavior of the ward that indicates the ward may pose a safety concern for the receiving county.

(5) The probation department of a receiving county that has a group home in which a minor is placed by the probation department of another county, after adjudication of the minor for any felony offense, may disclose to the sheriff of the receiving county or to the municipal police department of the city in which the group home is located, the name
 of the minor, the felony offense or offenses for which the minor has been adjudicated, and the address of the group home. This information shall be utilized only for law enforcement purposes and may not be utilized in a manner that is inconsistent with the rehabilitative program in which the minor has been placed or with the progress the minor may be making in the placement program. Notwithstanding any other law, the information provided by the probation department to a law enforcement agency under this paragraph may be provided to other law enforcement personnel for the limited law enforcement purposes described in this paragraph, but shall otherwise remain confidential.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 1538.5 of the Health and Safety Code, at the request of the probation department of the county in which the group home facility is located, the group home shall notify a probation official designated by the probation department to